District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.16

Repealed

Contracts for inspection, maintenance and repair of fixed equipment.

Repealed.

Oct. 12, 1968, 82 Stat. 1004, Pub. L. 90-573, § 1
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 410, 44 DCR 1423
1981 Ed., § 1-1129.
1973 Ed., § 1-824.